pt-PT: Perfil da tecla: Cereja; Choc; Cúbico; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Plano; G20; KAM; KAT; Baixo perfil; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Cilíndrico uniforme; Esférico uniforme; XDA; Outro
en: Keycap profile: Cherry; Choc; Cubic; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Flat; G20; KAM; KAT; Low profile; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Uniform cylindrical; Uniform spherical; XDA; Other
it: Profilo del copritasto: Ciliegio; Choc; Cubico; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Piatto; G20; KAM; KAT; Basso profilo; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Cilindrico uniforme; Sferico uniforme; XDA; Altro
ko: 키캡 프로필: 체리; 초크; 등축정계; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; 플랫; G20; KAM; KAT; 로우 프로파일; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; 토프레; 균일 원통형; 균일 구형; XDA; 기타
vi: Cấu hình nắp phím: Anh đào; Choc; Lập phương; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Phẳng; G20; KAM; KAT; Cấu hình thấp; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; Nhà sản xuất gốc; SA; Topre; Hình trụ đồng nhất; Hình cầu đồng nhất; XDA; Khác
hr-HR: Profil kapice tipke: Trešnja; Choc; Kubični; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Ravna; G20; KAM; KAT; Niski profil; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Jednoliki cilindrični; Jednoliki sferni; XDA; Ostalo
hu: Billentyűsapka profilja: Cseresznye; Choc; Kocka alakú; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Lapos; G20; KAM; KAT; Vékony; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Egységes hengeres; Egységes gömbölyű; XDA; Egyéb
sv: Tangenthattsprofil: Körsbär; Choc; Kubisk; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Platt; G20; KAM; KAT; Låg profil; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Enhetlig cylindrisk; Enhetlig sfärisk; XDA; Övrigt
pl: Profil nasadki na klawisze: Wiśnia; Choc; Sześcienny; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Płaski; G20; KAM; KAT; Niskoprofilowy; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Jednolity cylindryczny; Jednolity sferyczny; XDA; Inne
sl-SI: Profil kapice tipke: Češnja; Choc; Kubični; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Ploščata; G20; KAM; KAT; Nizek profil; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Enotno cilindrični; Enotno sferični; XDA; Drugo
nb: Tastehetteprofil: Kirsebær; Choc; Kubisk; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Flat; G20; KAM; KAT; Lav profil; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Uniform sylindrisk; Uniform sfærisk; XDA; Annet
zh-CN: 键帽轮廓: 樱桃; Choc; 立方晶系; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; 扁平的; G20; KAM; KAT; 轻薄; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; 均匀圆柱形; 均匀球形; XDA; 其他
cs: Profil klávesy: Třešeň; Choc; Kubická; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Plochý; G20; KAM; KAT; Nízký profil; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Jednotný válcový; Jednotný sférický; XDA; Jiné
da: Tastehætteprofil: Kirsebær; Choc; Kubisk; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Flad; G20; KAM; KAT; Lav profil; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Ensartet cylindrisk; Ensartet sfærisk; XDA; Andet
fr: Profil des touches: Cerise; Choc; Cubique; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Plate; G20; KAM; KAT; Profile bas; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Cylindrique uniforme; Sphérique uniforme; XDA; Autre
zh-TW: 鍵帽輪廓: 櫻桃; Choc; 立方體; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; 平坦; G20; KAM; KAT; 次級品; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; 統一圓柱型; 統一球面型; XDA; 其他
pt-BR: Perfil das teclas: Cereja; Choc; Cúbico; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Plana; G20; KAM; KAT; Discreto; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Cilíndrico uniforme; Esférico uniforme; XDA; Outro
el: Προφίλ καπακιού πλήκτρου: Κεράσι; Choc; Κυβικός; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Επίπεδη; G20; KAM; KAT; Χαμηλό προφίλ; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Ομοιόμορφο κυλινδρικό; Ομοιόμορφο σφαιρικό; XDA; Άλλο
ja: キーキャッププロファイル: チェリー; Choc; 立方体; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; フラット; G20; KAM; KAT; ロープロファイル; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; 均一円筒型; 均一球型; XDA; その他
th: โปรไฟล์คีย์แคป: เชอร์รี; Choc; คิวบิก; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; ราบ; G20; KAM; KAT; ใช้งานทั่วไป; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; ทรงกระบอกสม่ำเสมอ; ทรงกลมสม่ำเสมอ; XDA; อื่นๆ
fi: Näppäinhatun profiili: Kirsikka; Choc; Kuutio; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Tasainen; G20; KAM; KAT; Matalaprofiilinen; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Yhtenäinen sylinterimäinen; Yhtenäinen pallomainen; XDA; Muu
ro-RO: Profil capac de tastă: Cireș; Choc; Cubic; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Plată; G20; KAM; KAT; Cu fir scurt; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Cilindric uniform; Sferic uniform; XDA; Altele
de: Tastenkappenprofil: Kirsche; Choc; Kubisch; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Flach; G20; KAM; KAT; Niedriges Profil; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Einheitlich zylindrisch; Einheitlich sphärisch; XDA; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Профил на капачките на клавиатурата: Череша; Choc; Кубична; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Плосък; G20; KAM; KAT; Нисък профил; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Унифициран цилиндричен; Унифициран сферичен; XDA; Други
lt-LT: Klavišų dangtelių profilis: Vyšnia; Choc; Kubinis; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Plokščia; G20; KAM; KAT; Žemas profilis; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; Originalių dalių gamintojas; SA; Topre; Vienodas cilindrinis; Vienodas sferinis; XDA; Kita
sk-SK: Profil klávesov: Čerešňa; Choc; Kubický; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Rovný; G20; KAM; KAT; Nízky profil; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Uniformne valcový; Uniformne guľový; XDA; Iné
tr: Tuş başlığı profili: Kiraz; Choc; Kübik; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Düz; G20; KAM; KAT; Düşük profilli; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Tekdüze silindirik; Tekdüze küresel; XDA; Diğer
ru: Профиль колпачков клавиш: Вишня; Choc; Cubic; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Плоский; G20; KAM; KAT; Низкопрофильный; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Равномерный цилиндрический; Равномерный сферический; XDA; Другой
es: Perfil de las teclas: Cereza; Choc; Cúbico; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Puro; G20; KAM; KAT; Perfil bajo; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Cilíndrico uniforme; Esférico uniforme; XDA; Otros
nl: Toetsenkapprofiel: Kers; Choc; Kubus; DCS; DCX; DOM; DSA; Vlak; G20; KAM; KAT; Laag profiel; M0A; MBK; MDA; MDS; MOG; MT3; NP; OEM; SA; Topre; Uniform cilindrisch; Uniform sferisch; XDA; Andere